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DTC P0335/ 12, 13 Crankshaft Position Sensor Circuit
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Crankshaft position sensor (NE signal) consist of a signal plate and pick up coil.
The NE signal plate has 34 teeth and is mounted on the crankshaft. The NE signal sensor generates 34
signals of every engine revolution. The engine ECU detects the standard crankshaft angle based on the G2
signals, and the actual crankshaft angle the engine speed by the NE signals.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
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SOpen or short in crankshaft position sensor circuit
C k h f i i

P0335/12 13
cranking SCrankshaft positionsensor

P0335/12,13
Nocrankshaftpositionsensorsignal toengineECUwith
engine speed 600 rpm or more

SCrankshaft position sensor
SStarter

SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI1IK−06



A06632

G2, NE+ signal waveforms

5V/
Division

5V/
Division

G2

NE+

G2

NE+

20 m sec./Division (Idling)

10 m sec./Division (Idling)

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−51

1FZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
S Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

S Perform troubleshooting of DTC P0335/12,13 first. If no trouble is found, troubleshoot the following
mechanical systems.

1 Check resistance of crankshaft position sensor (See page IG−1).

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
Duringcrankingor idling,checkbetween terminalsG2and
NE−,NE+andNE − ofengineECU.
HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.

NG Replace crankshaft position sensor.

OK

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
crankshaft position sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 Inspect sensor installation and teeth of crankshaft timing pulley.

NG Tighten the sensor.
Replace crankshaft timing pulley.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


